Wisconsin, session 2025, SB287.
do enact as follows:SB287,11Section 1. 16.75 (1) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB287,2,10216.75 (1) (a) 1. All orders awarded or contracts made by the department for all 3materials, supplies, equipment, and contractual services to be provided to any 4agency, except as otherwise provided in par. (c) and subs. (2), (2g), (2m), (3m), (3t), 5(6), (7), (8), (9), (10e), (10m), and (10p), and (10r) and ss. 16.705 (1r), 16.73 (4) (a), 616.751, 16.754, 50.05 (7) (f), 153.05 (2m) (a), 165.987, and 287.15 (7), shall be 7awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, taking into consideration life cycle cost 8estimates under sub. (1m), when appropriate, the location of the agency, the 9quantities of the articles to be supplied, their conformity with the specifications, 10and the purposes for which they are required and the date of delivery.SB287,211Section 2. 16.75 (10r) of the statutes is created to read:SB287,2,161216.75 (10r) (a) In this subsection “federal employment eligibility verification 13program” means the system operated by the federal department of homeland 14security and the federal social security administration that allows an employer to 15enroll in the system and verify that its employees are eligible to work in the United 16States.SB287,3,317(b) The department, a designated purchasing agent under s. 16.71, an agency 1making purchases under s. 16.74, and any authority may not enter into a contract 2or order for the purchase of materials, supplies, equipment, or contractual services 3with any of the following:SB287,3,541. Except as provided in par. (e), an employer that is not enrolled in the federal 5employment eligibility verification program.SB287,3,862. An employer that knowingly employs an individual who has been identified 7by the federal employment eligibility verification program as ineligible to work in 8the United States.SB287,3,139(c) If the department, a designated purchasing agent under s. 16.71, an 10agency making purchases under s. 16.74, or any authority discovers that it has 11entered into a contract or order that violates par. (b), it shall terminate the contract 12or order without liability for the uncompleted portion or any materials or services 13purchased or paid for by the employer for use in completing the contract or order.SB287,3,1714(d) All contracts entered into under this section must contain written 15notification of the requirements in this subsection and a place for the employer that 16is awarded the contract to sign indicating that the employer is in compliance with 17the requirements.SB287,3,1918(e) Paragraph (b) 1. does not apply if the federal employment eligibility 19verification program is discontinued.SB287,320Section 3. 16.855 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB287,4,52116.855 (1m) The department shall let by contract to the lowest qualified 22responsible bidder all construction work when the estimated construction cost of 23the project exceeds $50,000, except for construction work authorized under s. 116.858 and except as provided in sub. (1r) or (10m) or s. 13.48 (19) or 16.856. 2Beginning in fiscal year 2023-24, this amount is $100,000. If factors other than 3dollar amounts are required to be evaluated for a project, the department shall 4specify a formula that will convert the other factors into a dollar value for 5comparison.SB287,46Section 4. 16.856 of the statutes is created to read:SB287,4,9716.856 Employment eligibility verification. (1) In this section “federal 8employment eligibility verification program” has the meaning given in s. 16.75 (10r) 9(a).SB287,4,1110(2) The department may not let any construction work by contract under s. 1116.855 (1m) to any of the following:SB287,4,1312(a) Except as provided in sub. (4), an employer that is not enrolled in the 13federal employment eligibility verification program.SB287,4,1614(b) An employer that knowingly employs an individual who has been 15identified by the federal employment eligibility verification program as ineligible to 16work in the United States.SB287,4,2017(3) All contracts let under s. 16.855 (1m) must contain written notification of 18the requirements in this section and a place for the employer that is awarded the 19contract to sign indicating that the employer is in compliance with the 20requirements.SB287,4,2221(4) Subsection (2) (a) does not apply if the federal employment eligibility 22verification program is discontinued.SB287,523Section 5. 66.05025 of the statutes is created to read:SB287,5,2166.05025 Employment eligibility verification. (1) Definitions. In this 2section:SB287,5,43(a) “Federal employment eligibility verification program” has the meaning 4given in s. 16.75 (10r) (a).SB287,5,55(b) “Local governmental unit” has the meaning given in s. 66.0131 (1) (a).SB287,5,116(2) Verification requirements. A local governmental unit that intends to 7hire an employee on or after the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts 8date], shall verify the individual’s identity under the federal employment eligibility 9verification program. A local governmental unit may not offer employment to any 10individual who is identified under the federal employment eligibility verification 11program as ineligible to work in the United States.SB287,5,1312(3) This section does not apply if the federal employment eligibility 13verification program is discontinued.SB287,614Section 6. 230.144 of the statutes is created to read:SB287,5,1715230.144 Employment eligibility verification program. (1) In this 16section “federal employment eligibility verification program” has the meaning given 17in s. 16.75 (10r) (a).SB287,5,2318(2) Beginning on the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], an 19agency shall verify under the federal employment eligibility verification program 20the identity of each individual that it intends to appoint to a position by enrolling in 21the federal employment eligibility verification program. An agency may not offer 22employment to any individual who is identified under the federal employment 23eligibility verification program as ineligible to work in the United States.SB287,6,21(3) This section does not apply if the federal employment eligibility 2verification program is discontinued.SB287,73Section 7. Initial applicability.SB287,6,64(1) State procurement and construction contracts. The treatment of ss. 516.75 (10r) and 16.856 first applies to a contract or order that is entered into on the 6effective date of this subsection.SB287,6,77